Wyoming statutes. Title 26 Insurance Code
Article 1. Newborn and Adopted Children Coverage

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Unborn child as insured or injured person within meaning of insurance policy, 15 ALR4th 548.

§ 26-20-101.
Newly born and adopted child coverage required.

All individual and group health insurance policies providing coverage on an expense incurred basis, and individual and group service or indemnity type contracts issued by any insurer including any nonprofit corporation which provide coverage for a family member of the insured or subscriber, shall also provide, as to the family members’ coverage, that the health insurance benefits applicable for children are automatically payable with respect to:

A newly born child of the insured or subscriber from the moment of birth; and

An adopted child from the earlier of the date the petition for adoption is filed or entry of the child in the adoptive home, except that when the child is in the custody of the state, coverage shall begin at the date of entry of a final decree of adoption. Coverage for an adopted child shall continue unless the petition is denied.

History.

Laws 1975, ch. 95, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 26.1-439.1; Laws 1983, ch. 190, § 1; 1989, ch. 132, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 26-20-102.
Specific coverage.

The coverage for newly born children shall consist of coverage of injury or sickness including the necessary care and treatment of medically diagnosed congenital defects and birth abnormalities. The coverage for adopted children shall consist of coverage of injury or sickness including the necessary care and treatment of medical conditions existing prior to the date of placement.

History.

Laws 1975, ch. 95, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 26.1-439.2; Laws 1983, ch. 190, § 1; 1989, ch. 132, § 1.

§ 26-20-103.
Premiums.

If payment of a specific premium or subscription fee is required to provide coverage for a child, the policy or contract may require that notification of birth of a child or the placement for adoption of a child and payment of the required premium or fees shall be furnished to the insurer or nonprofit service or indemnity corporation within thirty-one (31) days after the date of birth or after the date coverage of a child placed for adoption begins in order to have the coverage continue beyond the thirty-one (31) day period.

History.

Laws 1975, ch. 95, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 26.1-439.3; Laws 1983, ch. 190, § 1; 1989, ch. 132, § 1.

§ 26-20-104.
Applicability of article.

The requirements of this article regarding newly born children apply to all insurance policies and subscriber contracts delivered or issued for delivery in this state more than one hundred twenty (120) days after May 30, 1975. The requirements of this article regarding adopted children apply to all insurance policies and subscriber contracts delivered or issued for delivery in this state after June 8, 1989.

History.

Laws 1975, ch. 95, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 26.1-439.4; Laws 1983, ch. 190, § 1; 1989, ch. 132, § 1; 2001, ch. 142, § 2.